verbo/espanol_verbo.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +GER +IMPNE +IMPAF +PAPAS +POTI +IPRES +IPIMP +IPIND +IFUTU +SPRES +SPIMA +SFUTU +YO +TU +ELLA +NOS +VOS +UST

LEXICON Root

Verbo;

LEXICON VInf

+V:0 #;

+V+IPRES+YO:^1 #;
+V+IPRES+TU:^2 #;
+V+IPRES+ELLA:^3 #;
+V+IPRES+NOS:^4 #;
+V+IPRES+VOS:^5 #;
+V+IPRES+UST:^6 #;

+V+IPIMP+YO:*1 #;
+V+IPIMP+TU:*2 #;
+V+IPIMP+ELLA:*3 #;
+V+IPIMP+NOS:*4 #;
+V+IPIMP+VOS:*5 #;
+V+IPIMP+UST:*6 #;

+V+IPIND+YO:$1 #;
+V+IPIND+TU:$2 #;
+V+IPIND+ELLA:$3 #;
+V+IPIND+NOS:$4 #;
+V+IPIND+VOS:$5 #;
+V+IPIND+UST:$6 #;

+V+IFUTU+YO:)1 #;
+V+IFUTU+TU:)2 #;
+V+IFUTU+ELLA:)3 #;
+V+IFUTU+NOS:)4 #;
+V+IFUTU+VOS:)5 #;
+V+IFUTU+UST:)6 #;

+V+SPRES+YO:&1 #;
+V+SPRES+TU:&2 #;
+V+SPRES+ELLA:&3 #;
+V+SPRES+NOS:&4 #;
+V+SPRES+VOS:&5 #;
+V+SPRES+UST:&6 #;

+V+SPIMA+YO:(1 #;
+V+SPIMA+TU:(2 #;
+V+SPIMA+ELLA:(3 #;
+V+SPIMA+NOS:(4 #;
+V+SPIMA+VOS:(5 #;
+V+SPIMA+UST:(6 #;

+V+SPIMA+YO:((1 #;
+V+SPIMA+TU:((2 #;
+V+SPIMA+ELLA:((3 #;
+V+SPIMA+NOS:((4 #;
+V+SPIMA+VOS:((5 #;
+V+SPIMA+UST:((6 

+V+POTI+YO:$$1  #;
+V+POTI+TU:$$2 #;
+V+POTI+ELLA:$$3 #;
+V+POTI+NOS:$$4 #;
+V+POTI+VOS:$$5 #;
+V+POTI+UST:$$6 #;

+V+PAPAS:&& #;

+V+IMPAF+TU:^^2 #;
+V+IMPAF+ELLA:^^3 #;
+V+IMPAF+NOS:^^4 #;
+V+IMPAF+VOS:^^5 #;
+V+IMPAF+UST:^^6 #;

+V+IMPNE+TU:**2 #;
+V+IMPNE+ELLA:**3 #;
+V+IMPNE+NOS:**4 #;
+V+IMPNE+VOS:**5 #;
+V+IMPNE+UST:**6 #;

+V+GER:)) #;

LEXICON Verbo
aballar VInf;
abatanar VInf;
abemolar VInf;
abolsar VInf;
abortar VInf;
abrevar VInf;
abrumar VInf;
abusar VInf;
academizar VInf;
acaudalar VInf;
acelerar VInf;
acerrojar VInf;
achacar VInf;
achocar VInf;
aciberar VInf;
acoitar VInf;
acomedir VInf;
acopiar VInf;
acordeonar VInf;
acotar VInf;
acriminar VInf;
acuciar VInf;
adjetivar VInf;
admirar VInf;
adosar VInf;
adverar VInf;
afinar VInf;
afufar VInf;
agasajar VInf;
agorgojar VInf;
agregar VInf;
agusanar VInf;
ahornagar VInf;
ajar VInf;
alborotar VInf;
alegorizar VInf;
alimonar VInf;
almenar VInf;
alojar VInf;
altear VInf;
alzaprimar VInf;
amamantar VInf;
amar VInf;
amayorazgar VInf;
amillarar VInf;
amonedar VInf;
amortecer VInf;
amplificar VInf;
analizar VInf;
aneblar VInf;
anihilar VInf;
anquilosar VInf;
antiguar VInf;
aovar VInf;
apalancar VInf;
aparar VInf;
apastar VInf;
apechugar VInf;
apestar VInf;
apiñar VInf;
apoltronar VInf;
apostemar VInf;
apremiar VInf;
aproximar VInf;
aquerenciar VInf;
arcaizar VInf;
arenar VInf;
argumentar VInf;
arponear VInf;
arrastrar VInf;
arrepentir VInf;
arrogar VInf;
articular VInf;
asediar VInf;
asesorar VInf;
asonantar VInf;
astillar VInf;
atabalear VInf;
atalantar VInf;
atardecer VInf;
atenebrar VInf;
atesar VInf;
atizonar VInf;
atolondrar VInf;
atribular VInf;
atufar VInf;
augurar VInf;
auspiciar VInf;
avalar VInf;
avezar VInf;
azacanar VInf;
azolvar VInf;
balbucir VInf;
baldonear VInf;
bambalear VInf;
baquetear VInf;
basar VInf;
bastonear VInf;
bazucar VInf;
bendecir VInf;
bifurcar VInf;
blandir VInf;
blindar VInf;
bombardear VInf;
bostezar VInf;
brear VInf;
brocear VInf;
bugir VInf;
cabestrar VInf;
cacarañar VInf;
calefaccionar VInf;
callear VInf;
campanillear VInf;
cansar VInf;
capialzar VInf;
captar VInf;
carear VInf;
carraspear VInf;
castañetear VInf;
cebadar VInf;
cementar VInf;
centellear VInf;
cerdear VInf;
chalanear VInf;
charlar VInf;
cherchar VInf;
chinchar VInf;
chismorrear VInf;
chocar VInf;
chunguear VInf;
cinchar VInf;
circunvalar VInf;
clausurar VInf;
clorurar VInf;
cocear VInf;
cohechar VInf;
colegir VInf;
coludir VInf;
combinar VInf;
compadecer VInf;
compenetrar VInf;
comulgar VInf;
conciliar VInf;
condenar VInf;
conectar VInf;
congregar VInf;
connotar VInf;
consistir VInf;
constipar VInf;
contagiar VInf;
contextuar VInf;
contrabatir VInf;
contramarchar VInf;
contravenir VInf;
converger VInf;
copelar VInf;
coscar VInf;
criminalizar VInf;
crucificar VInf;
cubilar VInf;
culpar VInf;
curiosear VInf;
dar VInf;
decaer VInf;
decrementar VInf;
deflegmar VInf;
deletrear VInf;
demorar VInf;
depreciar VInf;
derrubiar VInf;
desaceitar VInf;
desacomodar VInf;
desadeudar VInf;
desaforrar VInf;
desajustar VInf;
desalinear VInf;
desamoblar VInf;
desanudar VInf;
desaplomar VInf;
desapropiar VInf;
desarrugar VInf;
desatorar VInf;
desbravar VInf;
descaecer VInf;
descapirotar VInf;
descastar VInf;
descercar VInf;
descoger VInf;
descompadrar VInf;
desconsolar VInf;
desdentar VInf;
desecar VInf;
desembotar VInf;
desembuchar VInf;
desempegar VInf;
desempuñar VInf;
desencarcelar VInf;
desencorvar VInf;
desengomar VInf;
desenlutar VInf;
desenrollar VInf;
desentonar VInf;
desesterar VInf;
desformar VInf;
desgolletar VInf;
deshabitar VInf;
deshebrar VInf;
deshumanizar VInf;
desjarretar VInf;
deslazar VInf;
desmanchar VInf;
desmedir VInf;
desnaturalizar VInf;
desosar VInf;
despachurrar VInf;
desparear VInf;
despavonar VInf;
despedregar VInf;
despleguetear VInf;
desprender VInf;
desquilatar VInf;
desterronar VInf;
destriunfar VInf;
desvalorar VInf;
desvendar VInf;
deterger VInf;
devanar VInf;
digitalizar VInf;
dirimir VInf;
disconvenir VInf;
disfrutar VInf;
dispersar VInf;
dividir VInf;
dolar VInf;
edificar VInf;
ejercer VInf;
emancipar VInf;
embalsar VInf;
emblanquecer VInf;
emborronar VInf;
embragar VInf;
embrujar VInf;
emburujar VInf;
empampar VInf;
empavonar VInf;
emperchar VInf;
empezar VInf;
emplumecer VInf;
empozar VInf;
enaguar VInf;
encabezar VInf;
encanecer VInf;
encaprichar VInf;
encarpetar VInf;
encasquillar VInf;
encepar VInf;
enchalecar VInf;
encizañar VInf;
encompadrar VInf;
encovar VInf;
endechar VInf;
endosar VInf;
enemistar VInf;
enfeudar VInf;
engarrotar VInf;
engolfar VInf;
engrescar VInf;
engrumecer VInf;
enhebillar VInf;
enjabonar VInf;
enjaretar VInf;
enjutar VInf;
enlosar VInf;
enmarcar VInf;
enraizar VInf;
enrielar VInf;
enrojecer VInf;
enrubiar VInf;
ensayar VInf;
ensoberbecer VInf;
entechar VInf;
enterrar VInf;
entorchar VInf;
entrelazar VInf;
entreoír VInf;
entroncar VInf;
enviscar VInf;
erigir VInf;
escafilar VInf;
escaramucear VInf;
escarificar VInf;
escindir VInf;
escopetear VInf;
escuadrar VInf;
escurrir VInf;
espaldear VInf;
especializar VInf;
esperar VInf;
esquilmar VInf;
estacionar VInf;
estandardizar VInf;
estilizar VInf;
estrenar VInf;
exaltar VInf;
excitar VInf;
exheredar VInf;
explicitar VInf;
extender VInf;
extremar VInf;
fallecer VInf;
fanfarronear VInf;
felicitar VInf;
filosofar VInf;
firmar VInf;
fletar VInf;
fluctuar VInf;
fracasar VInf;
frotar VInf;
fundar VInf;
garapiñar VInf;
garrar VInf;
gitanear VInf;
gofrar VInf;
granar VInf;
guarecer VInf;
gulusmear VInf;
halagar VInf;
harmonizar VInf;
hender VInf;
hervir VInf;
hipnotizar VInf;
holgazanear VInf;
hornaguear VInf;
huir VInf;
hurguetear VInf;
imantar VInf;
imprecar VInf;
incensar VInf;
incumbir VInf;
indisponer VInf;
infectar VInf;
inhabilitar VInf;
inmovilizar VInf;
inscribir VInf;
inspirar VInf;
instrumentalizar VInf;
interrogar VInf;
invertir VInf;
irritar VInf;
joder VInf;
kilometrar VInf;
lamprear VInf;
lardar VInf;
latinizar VInf;
lañar VInf;
liberalizar VInf;
liofilizar VInf;
loar VInf;
lucubrar VInf;
machihembrar VInf;
magnetizar VInf;
malear VInf;
malquistar VInf;
mancar VInf;
manifestar VInf;
marinar VInf;
mascar VInf;
matutear VInf;
mediar VInf;
memorizar VInf;
merodear VInf;
militar VInf;
minimizar VInf;
mitificar VInf;
modernizar VInf;
mohecer VInf;
molliznar VInf;
monear VInf;
mordiscar VInf;
mostrar VInf;
murmullar VInf;
narrar VInf;
nombrar VInf;
numerar VInf;
obrar VInf;
obviar VInf;
ofrecer VInf;
ondear VInf;
opinar VInf;
orillar VInf;
oxear VInf;
palear VInf;
palpar VInf;
papelonear VInf;
parametrizar VInf;
parrandear VInf;
pasear VInf;
pastorear VInf;
pautar VInf;
pendonear VInf;
pernear VInf;
personalizar VInf;
pespuntar VInf;
picotear VInf;
pintiparar VInf;
pisonear VInf;
piular VInf;
pluralizar VInf;
pollear VInf;
postrar VInf;
precautelar VInf;
predeterminar VInf;
prejuzgar VInf;
preocupar VInf;
presidir VInf;
prevalecer VInf;
privatizar VInf;
proclamar VInf;
promover VInf;
prorrumpir VInf;
proveer VInf;
pulular VInf;
quebrantar VInf;
quintaesenciar VInf;
ralear VInf;
raspear VInf;
realizar VInf;
rebautizar VInf;
rebosar VInf;
rebufar VInf;
recalcar VInf;
recelar VInf;
reciprocar VInf;
recomenzar VInf;
reconvertir VInf;
rectificar VInf;
redefinir VInf;
reedificar VInf;
reenvidar VInf;
reestrenar VInf;
refutar VInf;
registrar VInf;
rehenchir VInf;
reinstaurar VInf;
remarcar VInf;
remeter VInf;
remolcar VInf;
remullir VInf;
reorientar VInf;
repellar VInf;
reponer VInf;
reproducir VInf;
requintar VInf;
resecar VInf;
residir VInf;
respingar VInf;
restallar VInf;
retajar VInf;
retocar VInf;
retoñar VInf;
retroceder VInf;
revalorar VInf;
revenir VInf;
revolucionar VInf;
rilar VInf;
roer VInf;
roturar VInf;
rumbear VInf;
ruñar VInf;
sacudir VInf;
salariar VInf;
sancionar VInf;
secuenciar VInf;
senderear VInf;
sepultar VInf;
silabear VInf;
sisar VInf;
sobredimensionar VInf;
sobrepasar VInf;
sobrevenir VInf;
socalzar VInf;
sofocar VInf;
soler VInf;
solucionar VInf;
sorber VInf;
soñar VInf;
subseguir VInf;
suicidar VInf;
surgir VInf;
taconear VInf;
tallar VInf;
tamizar VInf;
tararear VInf;
tejer VInf;
tembletear VInf;
tender VInf;
teñir VInf;
tipificar VInf;
tomar VInf;
tornasolar VInf;
transcender VInf;
transitar VInf;
transponer VInf;
tranzar VInf;
trasformar VInf;
traspalear VInf;
trastear VInf;
trasverter VInf;
trenzar VInf;
trifurcar VInf;
tronzar VInf;
uniformar VInf;
variar VInf;
veranear VInf;
viciar VInf;
visitar VInf;
zahondar VInf;
zapear VInf;
